test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-even_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - potentiála: # SOSIAL
    potentiála+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [potentiála-]
    potentiála+N+Sg+Nom: potentiála
    potentiála+N+Sg+Gen: potentiála
    potentiála+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: potentiálame
    potentiála+N+Sg+Acc: potentiála
    potentiála+N+Sg+Ill: potentiálii
    potentiála+N+Sg+Loc: potentiálas
    potentiála+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: potentiálastan
    potentiála+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: potentiálastat
    potentiála+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: potentiálainan
    potentiála+N+Pl+Acc: potentiálaid
    potentiála+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: potentiálaidasat
    potentiála+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: potentiálaideameguin
    potentiála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: potentiálaš
    potentiála+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: potentiálažis
    potentiála+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: potentiálalažžan
    potentiála+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: potentiálaheapme

  Noun - doallovuoigatvuođalaš: # JOHTOLAT
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: doallovuoigatvuođalaš-
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Sg+Nom: doallovuoigatvuođalaš
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Sg+Gen: doallovuoigatvuođalačča
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Sg+Acc: doallovuoigatvuođalačča
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Sg+Ill: doallovuoigatvuođalažžii
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Sg+Loc: doallovuoigatvuođalaččas
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: doallovuoigatvuođalaččastan
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: doallovuoigatvuođalaččastat
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: doallovuoigatvuođalaččainan
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Pl+Acc: doallovuoigatvuođalaččaid
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: doallovuoigatvuođalaččaidasat
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: doallovuoigatvuođalaččaideameguin
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: doallovuoigatvuođalaččaš
    doallovuoigatvuođalaš+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: doallovuoigatvuođalaččažis

  Noun - álbmotbálkkašupmi: # UPMI
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Nom: álbmotbálkkašupmi
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Gen: [álbmotbálkkašumi, álbmotbálkkašume]
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: álbmotbálkkašupmáme
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Acc: álbmotbálkkašumi
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Ill: álbmotbálkkašupmái
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Loc: álbmotbálkkašumis
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: álbmotbálkkašumistan
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: álbmotbálkkašumistat
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: álbmotbálkkašumiinan
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Pl+Acc: álbmotbálkkašumiid
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: álbmotbálkkašumiidasat
    álbmotbálkkašupmi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: álbmotbálkkašumiideameguin

  Noun - oamastanovdáneapmi: # EAPMI
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: oamastanovdánan-
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Nom: oamastanovdáneapmi
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Gen: [oamastanovdáneami, oamastanovdáneame]
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: oamastanovdáneapmáme
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Acc: oamastanovdáneami
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Ill: oamastanovdáneapmái
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Loc: [oamastanovdáneamis, oamastanovdáneames]
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: oamastanovdáneamistan
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: oamastanovdáneamistat
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: oamastanovdánemiinan
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Pl+Acc: oamastanovdánemiid
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: oamastanovdánemiidasat
    oamastanovdáneapmi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: oamastanovdánemiideameguin


  Noun - leaŋggat: # BUVSSAT
    leaŋga+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: leaŋga-
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Acc: leaŋggaid
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: leaŋggaidasat
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: leaŋggaideameguin
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: leaŋggažat
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: leaŋggažiin
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: leaŋggaheapme

  Noun - sushi: # GARGIA
    sushi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: sushi-
    sushi+N+Sg+Nom: sushi
    sushi+N+Sg+Gen: sushi
    sushi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: sushime
    sushi+N+Sg+Acc: sushi
    sushi+N+Sg+Ill: sushii
    sushi+N+Sg+Loc: sushis
    sushi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: sushistan
    sushi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: sushistat
    sushi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: sushiinan
    sushi+N+Pl+Acc: sushiid
    sushi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: sushiidasat
    sushi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: sushiideameguin
    sushi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: sushiheapme
    
  Noun - boradankafea: # BUFFALO
    boradankafea+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [boradankafeaa-, boradankafea-]
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen: [boradankafeaa, boradankafea]
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen: [boradankafeaa, boradankafea]
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: boradankafeaame
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Acc: boradankafeaa
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Ill: boradankafeaii
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Loc: boradankafeaas
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: boradankafeaastan
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: boradankafeaastat
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: boradankafeaainan
    boradankafea+N+Pl+Acc: boradankafeaaid
    boradankafea+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: boradankafeaaidasat
    boradankafea+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: boradankafeaaideameguin
    boradankafea+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: boradankafeaaš
    boradankafea+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: boradankafeaažis
    boradankafea+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: boradankafeaaheapme

  Noun - boradankafea: # ESSAYA
    boradankafea+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: boradankafea-
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen: boradankafea
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen: boradankafea
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: boradankafeame
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Acc: boradankafea
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Ill: [boradankafeii, boradankafeai]
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Loc: boradankafeas
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: boradankafeastan
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: boradankafeastat
    boradankafea+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: boradankafeainan
    boradankafea+N+Pl+Acc: boradankafeaid
    boradankafea+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: boradankafeaidasat
    boradankafea+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: boradankafeaideameguin
    boradankafea+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: boradankafeaš
    boradankafea+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: boradankafeažis
    boradankafea+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: boradankafeaheapme

  Noun - dáruidahttináigumuš: # LEXMUSH
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: dáruidahttináigumuš-
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Nom: dáruidahttináigumuš
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Gen: dáruidahttináigumuša
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Acc: dáruidahttináigumuša
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Ill: dáruidahttináigumuššii
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Loc: dáruidahttináigumušas
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: dáruidahttináigumušastan
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: dáruidahttináigumušastat
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: dáruidahttináigumušainan
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Pl+Acc: dáruidahttináigumušaid
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: dáruidahttináigumušaidasat
    dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: dáruidahttináigumušaideameguin
